Massachusetts, session 194th, S1771.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 6E section 2 subsection (a) as appearing in the 
2022 edition is hereby amended by inserting after the words "Massachusetts Bar Association", 
when they first appear, the following:- 
“1 of whom shall be an active POST certified law enforcement officer below the rank of 
Captain from a department less than 50 officers, 1 of whom shall be an active POST Certified 
law enforcement officer below the rank of Captain from a department with 50 or more officers. 
Any POST Commissioner representing a labor organization must be POST certified and only 
one person from a police organization or police department may be appointed to the POST 
Commission at any one time."